Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4304
Limestone, defined.

Limestone shall mean a material consisting essentially of calcium carbonate or a combination of calcium carbonate with magnesium carbonate capable of neutralizing soil acidity.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 4.